District of Columbia statutes.
42-3502.23

Addition to Comprehensive Housing Strategy report.

The Mayor shall include in the reports to the Council pursuant to § 6-1054, analyses of the need, means, and methods of further assisting income qualified elderly tenants, disabled tenants, teachers of the District of Columbia Public Schools or a District of Columbia Public Charter School, and low-income tenants to pay their rent. The report shall consider:

(1)

The income and any other criteria that shall be used to determine which tenants qualify for the program;

(2)

The rent that qualified households shall pay;

(3)

The number and the allocation of units to be included in any set-aside;

(4)

The extent to which the program should incorporate any District affordable housing program and any federal affordable housing program available in the District;

(5)

The reporting requirements which should be imposed on housing providers subject to this subchapter and on qualified tenants to ensure that the program is effective.

July 17, 1985, D.C. Law 6-10, § 223
as added Aug. 5, 2006, D.C. Law 16-145, § 2(g), 53 DCR 4889
Housing Finance Agency, assisted housing projects, eligibility for rent supplements, see § 42-2703.08.
Homestead housing preservation, “low-income persons” defined, see § 42-2103.